Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5111.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 81105. (1) Subject to subsection (2), after an ORV has been titled under this part, both of the following apply: (a) The owner, except as provided in section 81104, shall not sell or otherwise assign ownership in the ORV without delivering to the transferee a certificate of title showing assignment of the ORV in the transferee's name. (b) A person shall not purchase or otherwise acquire an ORV without obtaining a certificate of title to it the ORV in the person's name pursuant to in accordance with either this part or the code. (2) As provided under section 81109(5), the department of state is not required to issue a certificate of title to the owner of an ORV if the title is subject to a security interest. (3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, the department of state may establish, implement, and operate an electronic system to process the notification and transfer of an ORV ownership interest between parties, if none of the parties is a dealer, through an electronic transfer. If the electronic system is established, a private party that uses the electronic system shall comply with any requirement of this section that the department determines is necessary and provide any information that is required by the department. The department may enter into 1 or more contracts to establish, implement, and operate the electronic system under this subsection. The contract must require the protection of proprietary information contained in the electronic system and other information as protected under this act.